New Mexico, session 2026, HB296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 7-2-18.15 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2007, Chapter 45, Section 9, as amended) is amended to read: "7-2-18.15. WORKING FAMILIES TAX CREDIT.-- A. A taxpayer who is a resident and who files an individual New Mexico income tax return may claim a credit in an amount equal to [twenty percent for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and twenty-five percent for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023] fifty percent of the federal earned income tax credit for which that taxpayer is eligible for the same taxable year or would have been eligible but for the identification number requirement pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 32(m), as that section may be amended or renumbered. B. A taxpayer who is a resident and who files an individual New Mexico tax return may claim a credit in an amount equal to [twenty percent for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and twenty-five percent for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023] fifty percent of the federal earned income tax credit for which that taxpayer would have been eligible for the same taxable year but for the age requirement pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 32(c)(1)(A)(ii)(II), as that section may be amended or renumbered; provided that the taxpayer is at least eighteen years of age but has not reached the age of twenty-five. C. The credit provided in this section may be referred to as the "working families tax credit". D. The working families tax credit may be deducted from the income tax liability of an individual who claims the credit and qualifies for the credit pursuant to this section. If the credit exceeds the individual's income tax liability for the taxable year, the excess shall be refunded to the individual. E. As used in this section, "federal earned income tax credit" means the tax credit allowed pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 32, as that section may be amended or renumbered." SECTION 2. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. - 3 -